Utah statutes.
48-2a-112.   No limitation on other changes.

The provisions of Sections 48-2a-108 and 48-2a-111 shall not be construed to limit the accomplishment of a change in the law governing, or the domicile of, any other entity in this state by any other means provided for in a partnership agreement or other agreement or as otherwise permitted by law.

